Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

For contingent expiration of this chapter, see Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 3.

CHAPTER 6607. WHARTON COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6607.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Wharton County Drainage District.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6607.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a drainage district created in Wharton County under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, subject to approval at a confirmation election under Section 6607.102.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6607.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects that are to be accomplished by the district under powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6607.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district territory is coextensive with the boundaries of Wharton County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 6607.051. DIRECTORS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors consisting of the Commissioners Court of Wharton County.

(b) Service on the board is an additional duty of office for a member of the Commissioners Court of Wharton County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6607.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has all rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state applicable to a drainage district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 56, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6607.102. CONFIRMATION ELECTION. (a) The board shall hold an election to confirm the creation of the district.

(b) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, does not apply to a confirmation election under this section.

(c) Except as provided by this section, the confirmation election must be conducted as provided by Sections 49.102(a)-(f), Water Code, and the Election Code.

(d) The district is not required to elect directors at the confirmation election.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (S.B. 637), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.